Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1603
Abandonment, defined.

Abandonment means the process of rendering a dam incapable of impounding by (1) dewatering and filling the reservoir created by such dam with solid materials and (2) creating a stable watercourse around the site.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 3.